Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Change of Name.

Collateral references. —

57 Am. Jur. 2d, Name, § 16 et seq.

65 C.J.S., Names, §§ 20-28.

Change of child’s name in adoption proceedings, 53 ALR2d 927.

Right of married woman to use maiden surname, 67 ALR3d 1266.

Circumstances justifying grant denial or denial of petition to change adult’s name, 79 A.L.R.3d 562.

Rights and remedies of parents inter se with respect to the names of their children, 40 ALR5th 697.

Sec. 09.55.010.
Jurisdiction in action for change of name.

A person may bring an action for change of name in the superior court.
A change of name of a person may not be made unless the court finds sufficient reasons for the change and also finds it consistent with the public interest.
A change of name upon marriage, dissolution, or divorce meets these requirements.

History.

(§ 8.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 66 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 15 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For procedures, see Civ.
R. 84(a).